Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Part 2

Tennessee Ridesharing Act

65-19-201. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Ridesharing Act.”

Acts 1984, ch. 557, § 1.

Cross-References. Citizen transportation area, § 65-15-115.

Exemption from motor carrier provisions, § 65-15-103.

Passenger rights forfeited for intoxication, § 65-20-105.

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability to state, OAG 85-206, 1985 Tenn. AG LEXIS 87 (6/26/85).

65-19-202. Part definitions.

“Ridesharing” means the prearranged transportation of persons in a motor vehicle where such transportation is incidental to another purpose of a volunteer driver, and includes ridesharing arrangements known as carpools, vanpools, and buspools.

Acts 1984, ch. 557, § 2.

65-19-203. Workers' compensation.

Title 50, chapter 6, concerning compensation for workers injured during the course of their employment, shall not apply to a person injured while participating in a ridesharing arrangement between such person's place of residence and place of employment or termini near such places; however, if the employer owns, leases, or contracts for the motor vehicle used in such an arrangement, title 50, chapter 6 shall apply.

Acts 1984, ch. 557, § 3.

65-19-204. Employer liability for injuries.

An employer shall not be liable for injuries to passengers and other persons resulting from the operation or use of a motor vehicle, not owned, leased, or contracted for by the employer, in a ridesharing arrangement unless the employee operating the motor vehicle is also on an errand or performing some task or function for the employer.

An employer shall not be liable for the injuries to passengers and other persons because it provides information, incentives or otherwise encourages its employees to participate in ridesharing arrangements. If the employer provides information, incentives, or otherwise encourages its employees to participate in ridesharing arrangements, the employer shall inform its employees that they will not be covered by the workers' compensation laws while participating in such arrangement unless while participating they perform some task or errand for the employer.

Acts 1984, ch. 557, § 4.

65-19-205. Local taxes and licenses.

No county, city, town, or other municipal corporation may impose a tax on or require a license for a motor vehicle used in a ridesharing arrangement other than that required for a private passenger automobile.

Acts 1984, ch. 557, § 5.

65-19-206. Additional registration fees.

The additional registration fees imposed by § 55-4-112 do not apply to any passenger motor vehicle used in a ridesharing arrangement, regardless of any compensation paid to the owner or driver of such a vehicle, unless the vehicle is also used to transport passengers for hire for other purposes.

Acts 1984, ch. 557, § 6.